Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
ARTICLE 18
CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES - STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS

Editor's note:

Amendments to this article by House Bill 08-1115, House Bill 08-1352, House Bill 08-1194, and Senate Bill 08-239 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the designation of correctional facilities and authorization for the construction thereof, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 120, Session Laws of Colorado 1990.

Section

17-18-101. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 08-1115 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire article added, p. 1029, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2013. (See L. 2008, p. 1029.)

17-18-102. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 08-1352 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire article added, p. 1035, § 2, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2013. (See L. 2008, p. 1035.)

17-18-103. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - SB 08-239 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire article added, p. 850, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2013. (See L. 2008, p. 850.)

17-18-104. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 08-1194 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire article added, p. 838, § 9, effective September 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(b)(I) repealed, (HB 10-1389), ch. 206, p. 897, § 7, effective May 5.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2013. (See L. 2008, p. 838.)

17-18-105. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 10-1081 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1081), ch. 256, p. 1141, § 7, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2015. (See L. 2010, p. 1141.)

17-18-106. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 10-1277 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1277), ch. 262, p. 1191, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2013. (See L. 2010, p. 1191.)

17-18-107. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - SB 10-128 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-128), ch. 415, p. 2048, § 10, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2015. (See L. 2010, p. 2048.)

17-18-108. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 13-1154 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1154), ch. 372, p. 2193, § 8, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2018. (See L. 2013, p. 2194.)

17-18-109. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 13-1318 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1318), ch. 330, p. 1875, § 3, effective December 10.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2016. (See L. 2013, p. 1875.)

17-18-110. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 13-1325 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1325), ch. 331, p. 1888, § 21, effective May 28.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2016. (See L. 2013, p. 1888.)

17-18-111. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - SB 14-049 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (SB 14-049), ch. 271, p. 1090, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2019. (See L. 2014, p. 1090.)

17-18-112. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - SB 14-161 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 567, § 30, effective May 9.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2017. (See L. 2014, p. 567.)

17-18-113. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - SB 14-092 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (SB 14-092), ch. 190, p. 710, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2017. (See L. 2014, p. 710.)

17-18-114. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 14-1037 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1037), ch. 358, p. 1683, § 6, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2019. (See L. 2014, p. 1683.)

17-18-115. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 14-1214 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1214), ch. 336, p. 1500, § 14, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2019. (See L. 2014, p. 1500.)

17-18-116. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - SB 14-176 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (SB 14-176), ch. 392, p. 1983, § 3, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2019. (See L. 2014, p. 1983.)

17-18-117. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 15-1229 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (HB 15-1229), ch. 239, p. 885, § 4, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2020. (See L. 2015, p. 885.)

17-18-118. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 15-1305 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (HB 15-1305), ch. 242, p. 896, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2020. (See L. 2015, p. 896.)

17-18-119. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 15-1341 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (HB 15-1341), ch. 274, p. 1116, § 2, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2020. (See L. 2015, p. 1116.)

17-18-120. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 15-1043 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (HB 15-1043), ch. 262, p. 998, § 11, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2020. (See L. 2015, p. 998.)

17-18-121. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - SB 15-067 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (SB 15-067), ch. 337, p. 1368, § 5, effective September 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2020. (See L. 2015, p. 1368.)

17-18-122. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - SB 16-142 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 593, § 83, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2019. (See L. 2016, p. 593.)

17-18-123. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 16-1080 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1080), ch. 327, p. 1328, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2021. (See L. 2016, p. 1328.)

17-18-124. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 18-1200 - repeal.

Pursuant to section 2-2-703, the following statutory appropriations are made in order to implement House Bill 18-1200, enacted in 2018:

For the 2019-20 state fiscal year, twenty-two thousand seventy-two dollars is appropriated to the department from the general fund;

For the 2020-21 state fiscal year, thirty-four thousand six hundred seventy-seven dollars is appropriated to the department from the general fund; and

For the 2021-22 state fiscal year, thirty-nine thousand three hundred thirty-four dollars is appropriated to the department from the general fund.

Repealed.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1200), ch. 379, p. 2294, § 8, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(1)(d) repealed, (HB 22-1330), ch. 104, p. 485, § 2, effective April 15.

17-18-125. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - SB 18-119 - repeal.

Pursuant to section 2-2-703, the following statutory appropriations are made in order to implement Senate Bill 18-119, enacted in 2018:

For the 2018-19 state fiscal year, twenty-two thousand seventy-two dollars is appropriated to the department from the general fund;

For the 2019-20 state fiscal year, thirty-four thousand six hundred seventy-seven dollars is appropriated to the department from the general fund;

For the 2020-21 state fiscal year, thirty-nine thousand three hundred thirty-four dollars is appropriated to the department from the general fund; and

For the 2021-22 state fiscal year, thirty-nine thousand three hundred thirty-four dollars is appropriated to the department from the general fund.

Repealed.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-119), ch. 299, p. 1822, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(1)(e) repealed, (HB 22-1330), ch. 104, p. 485, § 2, effective April 15.

17-18-126. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 18-1077 - repeal.

Pursuant to section 2-2-703, the following statutory appropriations are made in order to implement House Bill 18-1077, enacted in 2018:

For the 2020-21 state fiscal year, sixty-nine thousand eight hundred fifty-six dollars is appropriated to the department from the general fund; and

For the 2021-22 state fiscal year, four hundred sixty-seven thousand one hundred forty-four dollars is appropriated to the department from the general fund.

Repealed.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1077), ch. 376, p. 2281, § 3, effective June 6.

L. 2022:

(1)(c) repealed, (HB 22-1330), ch. 104, p. 485, § 2, effective April 15.

17-18-127. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - SB 19-172 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-172), ch. 365, p. 3360, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(2) added, (HB 20-1402), ch. 216, p. 1047, § 28, effective June 30.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2022. (See L. 2020, p. 1047.)

17-18-128. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - HB 19-1250 - repeal.

Pursuant to section 2-2-703, the following statutory appropriations are made in order to implement House Bill 19-1250, enacted in 2019:

For the 2019-20 state fiscal year, one hundred seventy-eight thousand four hundred seventy-one dollars is appropriated from the capital construction fund created in section 24-75-302 to the corrections expansion reserve fund created in section 17-1-116.

For the 2020-21 state fiscal year, thirty-nine thousand seven hundred one dollars is appropriated to the department from the general fund.

For the 2021-22 state fiscal year, forty-three thousand nine hundred sixteen dollars is appropriated to the department from the general fund.

Repealed.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1250), ch. 287, p. 2664, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(1)(d) and (1)(e) repealed, (HB 22-1330), ch. 104, p. 485, § 2, effective April 15.

17-18-129. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - SB 21-064 - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-064), ch. 190, p. 1008, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

Entire section repealed, (HB 22-1330), ch. 104, p. 485, § 2, effective April 15.

17-18-130. Appropriation to comply with section 2-2-703 - SB 21-064 - repeal.

Pursuant to section 2-2-703, the following statutory appropriations are made in order to implement Senate Bill 21-064, enacted in 2021:

For the 2021-22 state fiscal year, one hundred nine thousand four hundred sixty two dollars is appropriated from the capital construction fund created in section 24-75-302, to the corrections expansion reserve fund created in section 17-1-116.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-064), ch. 190, p. 1008, § 4, effective July 1.